Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,170
Certificate of inspection; certificate of registration; fees.

(1) Upon making an inspection of any boilers required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act and upon receipt of the inspection fee and certificate fee or registration fee, the boiler inspector shall give to the owner or user of the boilers a certificate of inspection or certificate of registration upon forms prescribed by the State Fire Marshal. The certificate shall be posted in a place near the location of such boiler.

(2) The State Fire Marshal shall establish the amount of the inspection fee, certificate fee, and registration fee by rule or regulation at the level necessary to meet the costs of administering the act.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 2(3), p. 393;

R.S.1943, § 48-704;

Laws 1965, c. 288, § 1, p. 824;

Laws 1980, LB 959, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-704;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1047, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-724;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 6.